District of Columbia statutes.
4-1321.01

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to require a report of a suspected neglected child in order to identify neglected children; to assure that protective services will be made available to a neglected child to protect the child and his or her siblings and to prevent further abuse or neglect; and to preserve the family life of the parents and children, to the maximum extent possible, by enhancing the parental capacity for adequate child care.

History

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1354, Pub. L. 89-775, § 1
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I, § 103(b), 24 DCR 3341

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1351.
1973 Ed., § 2-161.